Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2553.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 43, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding chapter 18, to read: CHAPTER 18 SCHOLARSHIP GRANTING ORGANIZATIONS ARTICLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS START_STATUTE43-1801. State election to participate; federal tax credit for individual contributions to scholarship granting organizations A. This state elects to participate in the federal tax credit established by section 25F of the internal revenue code for individuals who make qualified contributions to scholarship granting organizations. B. The department shall comply with all federal laws and regulations to administer the federal tax credit established by section 25F of the internal revenue code to ensure this state is eligible to participate in taxable years beginning from and after December 31, 2026 and annually submit all of the required information to the United States secretary of the treasury for participation. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE43-1802. Scholarship granting organizations; certification; list; rules A. A nonprofit organization in this state that is exempt or that has applied for exemption from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code may apply to the department for certification as a scholarship granting organization, and the department shall certify that the scholarship granting organization meets the requirements of section 25F of the internal revenue code and the applicable regulations or guidance issued by the United States secretary of the treasury. B. On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall: 1. Submit to the United States secretary of the treasury a list of the scholarship granting organizations that are certified pursuant to this section and that are located in this state. 2. Post the list submitted pursuant to paragraph 1 of this subsection on the department's official website. C. The department shall adopt rules and publish and prescribe forms and procedures necessary to administer this section. END_STATUTE START_STATUTE43-1803. Scholarships From and after December 31, 2026, a scholarship granting organization that is certified by the department and on the list submitted pursuant to section 43-1802, subsection B, paragraph 1 may provide scholarships to eligible students for any qualified elementary or secondary education expenses to the extent allowed under federal law. END_STATUTE